Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 51. Enterprise Zones
[Repealed]

§§ 57-51-1 through 57-51-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 524, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§§57-51-1 and57-51-3. [Laws, 1983, ch. 491, §§ 1, 2]

§57-51-5. [Laws, 1983, ch. 491, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 64]

§57-51-7. [Laws, 1983, ch. 491, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 42]

§§57-51-9 through57-51-13. [Laws, 1983, ch. 491, §§ 5-7]

§57-51-15. [Laws, 1983, ch. 491, § 8; Laws, 1988, ch. 494, § 2]